Florida, session 2026, SB1182.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 34 35 Section 1.âParagraph (cc) is added to subsection (8) of 36 section 213.053, Florida Statutes, to read: 37 213.053âConfidentiality and information sharing.â 38 (8)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 39 the department may provide: 40 (cc)âState tax information relative to the exemptions in s. 41 295.189(5) pursuant to any formal agreement for the mutual 42 exchange of information between the Department of Veteransâ 43 Affairs, the Department of State, and the Department of Revenue. 44 45 Disclosure of information under this subsection shall be 46 pursuant to a written agreement between the executive director 47 and the agency. Such agencies, governmental or nongovernmental, 48 shall be bound by the same requirements of confidentiality as 49 the Department of Revenue. Breach of confidentiality is a 50 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided by s. 51 775.082 or s. 775.083. 52 Section 2.âSection 295.189, Florida Statutes, is created to 53 read: 54 295.189âBusiness development incentives for veterans and 55 military spouses.â 56 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida 57 Veterans and Military Spouses Business Development Act.â 58 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 59 (a)âThe Legislature finds that veterans and military 60 spouses contribute significantly to this stateâs economy through 61 their skills, expertise, and entrepreneurial efforts. 62 (b)âThe Legislature recognizes the challenges of frequent 63 relocations and economic instability faced by many military 64 spouses. 65 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this act serve 66 to attract and support veteran-owned and military spouse-owned 67 businesses by providing incentives. 68 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 69 (a)ââMilitary spouseâ means a spouse of: 70 1.âAn active duty member of the United States Armed Forces; 71 or 72 2.âA veteran. 73 (b)ââVeteranâ has the same meaning as in s. 1.01(14). 74 (c)ââVeteran-owned or military spouse-owned businessâ means 75 any business entity: 76 1.âThat employs 200 or fewer permanent full-time employees. 77 2.âThat, together with its affiliates, has a net worth of 78 $5 million or less or, if a sole proprietorship, has a net worth 79 of $5 million or less including personal and business 80 investments. 81 3.âThat is domiciled in this state. 82 4.âThat is at least 51 percent owned and operated by one or 83 more veterans or military spouses. 84 5.âThe management and daily business operations of which 85 are controlled by one or more veterans or military spouses. 86 6.âThat has a professional license, if required by the 87 industry, in the name of a veteran or military spouse who owns 88 the business entity. 89 (4)âFEE WAIVER.â 90 (a)âThe Department of State shall waive all fees for: 91 1.âA new business established by a veteran or military 92 spouse in this state. 93 2.âAn existing veteran-owned or military spouse-owned 94 business in this state. 95 (b)âThe fee waivers apply to veteran-owned or military 96 spouse-owned businesses established between July 1, 2026, and 97 June 30, 2031. 98 (5)âTAX EXEMPTIONS.â 99 (a)âEligible veteran-owned and military spouse-owned 100 businesses shall receive: 101 1.âA temporary increase in the exemption provided by s. 102 220.14 for business entities incorporated in this state and 103 subject to the tax imposed by chapter 220, for the taxable year 104 in which the Department of Veteransâ Affairs verifies the 105 veteran-owned or military spouse-owned business pursuant to 106 subsection (7) and for each of the 4 subsequent taxable years. 107 a.âA business that is 100 percent veteran-owned or military 108 spouse-owned is eligible to receive an exemption from the tax 109 imposed by chapter 220, totaling $100,000 per taxable year for 5 110 taxable years, after being in business for at least 5 years from 111 the date of its incorporation in this state. 112 b.âA business that is at least 51 percent veteran-owned or 113 military spouse-owned but does not qualify for the tax exemption 114 under sub-subparagraph a. is eligible to receive an exemption 115 from the tax imposed by chapter 220, totaling $100,000 per 116 taxable year for 5 taxable years, after being in business for at 117 least 7 years from the date of its incorporation in this state. 118 2.âA one-time sales tax exemption for veteran-owned or 119 military spouse-owned businesses for purchases of equipment and 120 supplies directly related to and used for business operations. 121 This exemption does not apply to purchases of items that are 122 used for personal purposes or items used for both personal and 123 business purposes. 124 a.âA business entity that is at least 51 percent veteran 125 owned or military spouse-owned is eligible to receive the sales 126 tax exemption during the first year of business upon the 127 issuance of a temporary tax exemption certificate by the 128 Department of Revenue. 129 b.âA business entity incorporated in this state and subject 130 to the tax imposed by chapter 220 which is 100 percent veteran 131 owned or military spouse-owned and has been in business for 5 132 years and whose net income as reported on its Florida corporate 133 income or franchise tax return after application of the 134 exemption provided in s. 220.14 is $0 for the 5th taxable year 135 is eligible to receive the 1-year sales tax exemption upon the 136 issuance of a temporary tax certificate by the Department of 137 Revenue. 138 c.âA business entity incorporated in this state and subject 139 to the tax imposed by chapter 220 which is at least 51 percent 140 veteran-owned or military spouse-owned and has been in business 141 for 7 years and whose net income as reported on its Florida 142 corporate income or franchise tax return is $0 for the 7th 143 taxable year is eligible to receive the 1-year sales tax 144 exemption upon the issuance of a temporary tax exemption 145 certificate by the Department of Revenue. 146 (b)âThe Department of Revenue shall adopt rules to 147 establish procedures for claiming the tax exemptions and for the 148 developing and issuing of temporary sales tax exemption 149 certificates upon notification of application approval by the 150 Department of Veteransâ Affairs. 151 (c)âFor veteran-owned and military spouse-owned businesses 152 relocating to this state, the tax exemptions apply for 5 years 153 after the date on which the business is established. 154 (6)âADMINISTRATION.âThe Department of Veteransâ Affairs, 155 the Department of Revenue, and the Department of State shall: 156 (a)âDevelop rules for administering this section. 157 (b)âEnsure interagency cooperation for seamless 158 implementation of this section. 159 (7)âREGISTRATION.â 160 (a)âThe Department of Veteransâ Affairs shall establish 161 registration requirements for applicants seeking the fee waivers 162 and tax exemptions provided by this section. The registration 163 requirements must include: 164 1.âFor veterans, a DD Form 214 or another acceptable form 165 of identification as specified by the United States Department 166 of Veteransâ Affairs, provided that the applicant served in and 167 was honorably discharged from a branch of the United States 168 Armed Forces. 169 2.âFor military spouses, verification of a military spouse 170 relationship and that the other spouse is on active duty or a 171 veteran. 172 3.âVerification that the applicantâs business meets the 173 requirements provided in subparagraphs (3)(c)1.-6. 174 4.âThe date on which the applicant began doing business in 175 this state. 176 5.âFor applicants seeking the 1-year sales tax exemption 177 provided under subparagraph (5)(a)2. must include a copy of 178 their Florida corporate income or franchise tax return in order 179 to verify the net income reported for the 5th or 7th taxable 180 year, as applicable. 181 (b)âApplicants meeting the registration requirements of 182 paragraph (a) shall receive a veteran-owned or military spouse 183 owned business verification letter from the Department of 184 Veteransâ Affairs. 185 1.âThe verification letter may be presented to the 186 Department of State to claim the fee waiver provided in 187 subsection (4). 188 2.âThe verification letter must be attached to the Florida 189 corporate income or franchise tax return to claim the increased 190 temporary exemption provided by subparagraph (5)(a)1. 191 3.âThe verification letter may be presented to the 192 Department of Revenue to receive a temporary tax exemption 193 certificate pursuant to subparagraph (5)(a)2. 194 (c)âThe Department of Veteransâ Affairs shall notify the 195 Department of Revenue and the Department of State upon 196 successful verification of the veteran-owned or military spouse 197 owned business. 198 (8)âANNUAL REPORTING.âBeginning December 31, 2026, and each 199 December 31 thereafter, the Department of Veteransâ Affairs 200 shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of the 201 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives which 202 includes: 203 (a)âThe number of veteran-owned and military spouse-owned 204 businesses that were established in this state. 205 (b)âEconomic metrics, such as job creation and tax revenue 206 impact from veteran-owned and military spouse-owned businesses. 207 (c)âDemographic data for the participating veterans and 208 military spouses. 209 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.